Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 43 Mediation

Law reviews. —

For article, “Mediation and Wyoming Domestic Relations Cases — Practical Considerations, Ethical Concerns and Proposed Standards of Practice,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Alternative dispute resolution: sanctions for failure to participate in good faith in, or comply with agreement made in, mediation, 43 ALR5th 545.

§ 1-43-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Communication” means any item of information disclosed during the mediation process through files, reports, interviews, discussions, memoranda, case summaries, notes, work products of the mediator, or any other item of information disclosed during the mediation, whether oral or written;

“Mediation” means a process in which an impartial third person facilitates communication between two (2) or more parties in conflict to promote reconciliation, settlement, compromise or understanding;

“Mediator” means an impartial third person not involved in the conflict, dispute or situation who engages in mediation;

“Party to the mediation” means a person who is involved in the conflict, dispute or situation and is rendered mediation services by a mediator or consults a mediator with a view to obtaining mediation services;

“Representative of the mediator” means a person employed by the mediator to assist in the rendition of mediation services;

“Representative of the party” means a person having authority to obtain mediation services on behalf of the party to the mediation or to act on advice rendered by the mediator;

“This act” means W.S.

1-43-101

through

1-43-104

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 217, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

Donnelly v. Donnelly, 2004 WY 72, 92 P.3d 298,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(2004).

§ 1-43-102.
General rule of confidentiality.

Any communication is
confidential if not intended to be disclosed to third persons other
than those to whom disclosure is in furtherance of the mediation process
or those reasonably necessary for the transmission of the communication.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 217, § 1.

Quoted

in

Donnelly v. Donnelly, 2004 WY 72, 92 P.3d 298,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(2004).

§ 1-43-103.
General rule of privilege; claiming privilege; exception.

A party to the mediation has a privilege to refuse to disclose and to prevent all mediation participants from disclosing confidential communications.

The privilege under this section may be claimed by a representative of the party or by a party, his guardian or conservator, the personal representative of a deceased party, or the successor, trustee or similar representative of a corporation, association, or other organization, whether or not in existence. The person who was the mediator may claim the privilege but only on behalf of the party. The mediator’s authority to do so is presumed in the absence of evidence to the contrary.

There is no privilege under this section if any one (1) of the following conditions is met:

All the parties involved provide written consent to disclose;

The communication involves the contemplation of a future crime or harmful act;

The communication indicates that a minor child has been or is the suspected victim of child abuse as defined by local statute;

The communication was otherwise discoverable prior to the mediation;

One of the parties seeks judicial enforcement of the mediated agreement.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 217, § 1.

Quoted

in

Donnelly v. Donnelly, 2004 WY 72, 92 P.3d 298,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Testimonial privilege for confidential communications between relatives other than husband and wife — state cases, 62 ALR5th 629.

§ 1-43-104.
Immunity.

Mediators are immune
from civil liability for any good faith act or omission within the
scope of the performance of their power and duties.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 217, § 1.